Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.020

Established—Duties—Administrative assistance.

(1) The Washington tourism marketing authority is established as a public body constituting an instrumentality of the state of Washington.

(2) The authority is responsible for contracting for statewide tourism marketing services that promote tourism on behalf of the citizens of the state, and for managing the authority's financial resources.

(3) The department provides administrative assistance to the authority and serves as the fiscal agent of the authority for moneys appropriated for purposes of the authority.

(4) The authority must create a private local account to receive nonstate funds and state funds, other than general fund state funds, contributed to the authority for purposes of this chapter.

[ 2018 c 275 s 3.]